Washington statutes.
RCW 10.58.030

Confession as evidence.

The confession of a defendant made under inducement, with all the circumstances, may be given as evidence against him or her, except when made under the influence of fear produced by threats; but a confession made under inducement is not sufficient to warrant a conviction without corroborating testimony.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1054; Code 1881 s 1070; 1873 p 234 s 232; 1854 p 117 s 96; RRS s 2151.]